de: Verwendungszweck des Webschiffchens: Weben mit feinem Garn; Allzweckweben; Bandweben; Flicken-/Streifenweben; Teppichweben; Brettchenweben; Gobelinweben; Andere
hr-HR: Okvir za uporabu tkalačkog šatla: Tkanje finom pređom; Tkanje opće namjene; Tkanje traka; Tkanje krpa/traka; Tkanje tepiha; Tkanje na daščice; Tkanje tapiserija; Ostalo
es: Caso de uso de la lanzadera de tejido: Tejido de hilo fino; Tejido de uso general; Tejido en telar inkle; Tejido de trapos/tiras; Tejido de alfombras; Tejido con tablillas; Tejido de tapices; Otro
ru: Область применения челнока: Ткачество из тонкой пряжи; Универсальное ткачество; Ткачество на лентоткацком станке; Ткачество из лоскутов/полос; Ткачество ковров; Ткачество на дощечках; Гобеленовое ткачество; Другое
th: การใช้กระสวยทอผ้า: ทอด้ายเส้นเล็ก; ทออเนกประสงค์; ทออิงเกิล; ทอเศษผ้า/แถบผ้า; ทอพรม; ทอแท็บเล็ต; ทอทาเพสทรี; อื่นๆ
nl: Weefschietspoel toepassing: Weven met fijn garen; Weven voor algemeen gebruik; Bandweven; Vodden-/strokenweven; Tapijt weven; Kaartweven; Wandtapijt weven; Overig
nb: Bruksområde for vevskyttelen: Finveving; Generell veving; Båndveving; Filleveving; Teppeveving; Brikkeveving; Billedveving; Annet
pt-PT: Utilização prevista da lançadeira de tecelagem: Tecelagem de fios finos; Tecelagem de uso geral; Tecelagem em tear de fitas; Tecelagem de trapos/tiras; Tecelagem de tapetes; Tecelagem com cartões; Tecelagem de tapeçaria; Outro
bg-BG: Предназначение на тъкачната совалка: Тъкане на фина прежда; Тъкане с общо предназначение; Тъкане на ленти; Тъкане с парцали/ленти; Тъкане на килими; Тъкане на кори; Тъкане на гоблени; Други
el: Περίπτωση χρήσης σαΐτας ύφανσης: Ύφανση λεπτού νήματος; Ύφανση γενικής χρήσης; Ύφανση Inkle; Ύφανση με κουρέλια/λωρίδες; Ύφανση χαλιών; Ύφανση με κάρτες; Ύφανση ταπισερί; Άλλο
en: Weaving shuttle use case: Fine yarn weaving; General-purpose weaving; Inkle weaving; Rag/strip weaving; Rug weaving; Tablet weaving; Tapestry weaving; Other
hu: Szövővetélő felhasználási területe: Finom fonalú szövés; Általános célú szövés; Szalagszövés; Rongyszövés; Szőnyegszövés; Kártyaszövés; Gobelinszövés; Egyéb
vi: Hộp đựng con thoi dệt: Dệt sợi mảnh; Dệt đa dụng; Dệt đai; Dệt vải vụn/dải; Dệt thảm; Dệt thẻ; Dệt thảm treo tường; Khác
sl-SI: Primer uporabe tkačnega čolnička: Tkanje fine preje; Večnamensko tkanje; Tkanje trakov (inkle); Tkanje iz cunj/trakov; Tkanje preprog; Tkanje na deščice; Tkanje tapiserij; Drugo
fr: Usage de la navette de tissage: Tissage de fil fin; Tissage polyvalent; Tissage Inkle; Tissage de chiffons/bandes; Tissage de tapis; Tissage aux cartons; Tissage de tapisserie; Autre
fi: Kudontasukkulan käyttötapa: Hienolankakudonta; Yleiskudonta; Pirtanauhakudonta; Räsy-/kudekudonta; Matonkudonta; Lautanauhakudonta; Kuvakudonta; Muu
it: Caso d'uso della navetta per tessitura: Tessitura di filati sottili; Tessitura per uso generico; Tessitura a nastro; Tessitura con stracci/strisce; Tessitura di tappeti; Tessitura a tavolette; Tessitura di arazzi; Altro
ja: 織機シャトル用途: 極細糸織り; 汎用織り; インクル織り; 裂き織り/ラグ織り; ラグ織り/絨毯織り; タブレット織り; タペストリー織り; その他
sk-SK: Prípad použitia tkáčskeho člnka: Tkanie s jemnou priadzou; Tkanie na všeobecné účely; Tkanie stúh (inkle); Tkanie handier/pruhov; Tkanie kobercov; Tkanie na karetkách; Tkanie gobelínov; Iné
ro-RO: Situația de utilizare al suveicii de țesut: Țesut cu fire fine; Țesut de uz general; Țesut tip inkle; Țesut de cârpe/fâșii; Țesut de covoare; Țesut cu plăcuțe; Țesut de tapiserie; Altele
da: Anvendelse for væveskytte: Vævning med fint garn; Universel vævning; Båndvævning; Kludevævning; Tæppevævning; Brikvævning; Billedvævning; Andet
ko: 직조 셔틀 용도: 가는 실 직조; 다목적 직조; 잉클 직조; 천 조각/스트립 직조; 러그 직조; 태블릿 직조; 태피스트리 직조; 기타
sv: Användningsområde för vävskyttel: Fingarnsvävning; Allroundvävning; Bandvävning; Trasvävning; Mattvävning; Brickvävning; Bildvävning; Övrigt
tr: Dokuma mekik kullanım amacı: İnce iplik dokuma; Genel amaçlı dokuma; Şerit dokuma; Paçavra/şerit dokuma; Halı/kilim dokuma; Çarpana dokuma; Goblen dokuma; Diğer
zh-CN: 织布梭用例: 细纱编织; 通用编织; 织带编织; 碎布/条带编织; 地毯编织; 卡片编织; 挂毯编织; 其他
zh-TW: 織梭使用情境): 細紗編織; 通用編織; 帶織; 碎布/布條編織; 地毯編織; 卡織; 掛毯編織; 其他
cs: Účel použití tkacího člunku: Tkaní z jemné příze; Univerzální tkaní; Tkaní stuh; Tkaní z hadrů/pruhů; Tkaní koberců; Karetkování; Tkaní gobelínů; Jiný
lt-LT: Audimo šaudyklės naudojimo dėžė: Plonų verpalų audimas; Bendrosios paskirties audimas; Juostų audimas; Skiaučių / juostelių audimas; Kilimų audimas; Vytinis audimas; Gobelenų audimas; Kita
pt-BR: Lançadeira de tecelagem caso de uso: Tecelagem de fios finos; Tecelagem de uso geral; Tecelagem inkle; Tecelagem de trapos/tiras; Tecelagem de tapetes; Tecelagem com cartões; Tecelagem de tapeçaria; Outro
pl: Zastosowanie czółenka tkackiego: Tkanie z cienkiej przędzy; Tkanie ogólnego przeznaczenia; Tkanie krajek; Tkanie ze ścinków/pasków; Tkanie dywanów; Tkactwo tabliczkowe; Tkanie gobelinów; Inne